Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1211] WINTER SPORTS CONSERVATION SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue winter sports conservation special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays special plate fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) contributes $....... upon initial application and a minimum of $....... annually to the winter sports conservation account; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the phrase "WINTER SPORTS CONSERVATION." new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates may be transferred to another qualified motor vehicle that is registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (5), must be deposited in the winter sports conservation account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is first appropriated to the commissioner of public safety for the annual cost of administering the account. The remaining money is appropriated to the commissioner of natural resources as follows: (1) notwithstanding section 84.83, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), 50 percent for grants-in-aid to develop, maintain, and groom snowmobile trails and acquire easements; and (2) 50 percent for distribution to Keep It Clean MN for efforts to reduce waste on ice under section 97C.363. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for special plates issued on or after that date. new text end